Washington statutes.
RCW 7.05.420

Form and contents of award.

(1) The award shall be made in writing and shall be signed by the arbitrator or arbitrators. In arbitral proceedings with more than one arbitrator, the signatures of the majority of all members of the arbitral tribunal shall suffice, provided that the reason for any omitted signature is stated.

(2) The award shall state the reasons upon which it is based, unless the parties have agreed that no reasons are to be given or the award is an award on agreed terms under RCW 7.05.410.

(3) The award shall state its date and the place of arbitration as determined in accordance with RCW 7.05.310(1). The award shall be deemed to have been made at that place.

(4) After the award is made, a copy signed by the arbitrators in accordance with subsection (1) of this section shall be delivered to each party.

[ 2015 c 276 s 42.]